twol/lez_add_rules2.twol
Alphabet
  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у уь ф х ц ч Ӏ ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
  а:0 %- %> %>:0
;

Sets
Vowel = а е ё и о у ь ы э ю я ;

Rules

"change Elative form when In localization form is а to avoid vowel hiatus"
а:0 <=> а %> _ й ;

"change Elative form when In localization form is е to avoid vowel hiatus"
а:0 <=> е %> _ й ;

"change Elative form when In localization form is у to avoid vowel hiatus"
а:0 <=> у %> _ й ;

"change morpheme boundaries in Super localization"
%>:0 <=> _ Vowel %> л ;
